Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Broker-Dealers, Agents, Investment Advisers, Investment Adviser
Representatives, And Federal Covered Investment Advisers

§ 17-4-401.
Broker-dealers
registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for a person to transact business in this state as a broker-dealer unless the person is registered under this act as a broker-dealer or is exempt from registration as a broker-dealer under subsection (b) or (d) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

A broker-dealer without a place of business in this state if its only transactions effected in this state are exclusively with or through:

The issuer of the securities involved in the transactions;

A broker-dealer registered as a broker-dealer under this act or not required to be registered as a broker-dealer under this act;

An institutional investor;

A nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) acting for the account of others pursuant to discretionary authority in a signed record;

A bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is not in this state and the person is registered as a broker-dealer under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the customer maintains a principal place of residence;

A bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is in this state but was not present in this state when the customer relationship was established, if:

The broker-dealer is registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is registered under the securities laws of the state in which the customer relationship was established and where the customer had maintained a principal place of residence; and

Within forty-five (45) days after the customer’s first transaction in this state, the person files an application for registration as a broker-dealer in this state and a further transaction is not effected more than seventy-five (75) days after the date on which the application is filed, or, if earlier, the date on which the secretary of state notifies the person that the secretary of state has denied the application for registration or has stayed the pendency of the application for good cause.

Not more than one (1) customer in this state during the previous twelve (12) months, in addition to those customers specified in subparagraphs (A) through (F) and under subparagraph (H) of this paragraph, if the broker-dealer is registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the broker-dealer has its principal place of business; and

Any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

A person that deals solely in United States government securities and is supervised as a dealer in government securities by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or the office of thrift supervision.

It is unlawful for a broker-dealer, or for an issuer engaged in offering, offering to purchase, purchasing, or selling securities in this state, directly or indirectly, to employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to securities transactions in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-dealer, an issuer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser by an order of the secretary of state under this act, the securities and exchange commission, or a self-regulatory organization. A broker-dealer or issuer does not violate this subsection if the broker-dealer or issuer did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from a broker-dealer or issuer and for good cause, an order under this act may modify or waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the broker-dealer.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may permit:

A broker-dealer that is registered in Canada or other foreign jurisdiction and that does not have a place of business in this state to effect transactions in securities with or for, or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of any securities by:

An individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is temporarily present in this state and with whom the broker-dealer had a bona fide customer relationship before the individual entered the United States;

An individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is present in this state and whose transactions are in a self-directed tax advantaged retirement plan of which the individual is the holder or contributor in that foreign jurisdiction; or

An individual who is present in this state, with whom the broker-dealer customer relationship arose while the individual was temporarily or permanently resident in Canada or the other foreign jurisdiction.

An agent who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under this subsection to effect transactions in securities or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of securities in this state as permitted for a broker-dealer described in paragraph (i) of this subsection.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Applied

in

Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 17-4-402.
Agent
registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for an individual to transact business in this state as an agent unless the individual is registered under this act as an agent or is exempt from registration as an agent under subsection (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

An individual who represents a broker-dealer in effecting transactions in this state limited to those described in section 15(h)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78(o)(2));

An individual who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under W.S. 17-4-401(b) or (d);

An individual who represents an issuer with respect to an offer or sale of the issuer’s own securities or those of the issuer’s parent or any of the issuer’s subsidiaries, and who is not compensated in connection with the individual’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

An individual who represents an issuer and who effects transactions in the issuer’s securities exempted by W.S.

17-4-202

, other than W.S.

17-4-202

(a)(xi) and (xiv);

An individual who represents an issuer that effects transactions solely in federal covered securities of the issuer, but an individual who effects transactions in a federal covered security under section 18(b)(3) or 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(3) or 77r(b)(4)(D)) is not exempt if the individual is compensated in connection with the agent’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

An individual who represents a broker-dealer registered in this state under W.S. 17-4-401(a) or exempt from registration under W.S. 17-4-401(b) in the offer and sale of securities for an account of a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) acting for the account of others pursuant to discretionary authority in a signed record;

An individual who represents an issuer in connection with the purchase of the issuer’s own securities;

An individual who represents an issuer and who restricts participation to performing clerical or ministerial acts; or

Any other individual exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

The registration of an agent is effective only while the agent is employed by or associated with a broker-dealer registered under this act or an issuer that is offering, selling, or purchasing its securities in this state.

It is unlawful for a broker-dealer, or an issuer engaged in offering, selling, or purchasing securities in this state, to employ or associate with an agent who transacts business in this state on behalf of broker-dealers or issuers unless the agent is registered under subsection (a) of this section or exempt from registration under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-403.
Investment
adviser registration requirement.

It is unlawful for a person to transact business in this state as an investment adviser unless the person is registered under this act as an investment adviser or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser under subsection (b) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

A person without a place of business in this state that is registered under the securities act of the state in which the person has its principal place of business if its only clients in this state are:

Federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this act, or broker-dealers registered under this act;

Institutional investors;

Bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this state if the investment adviser is registered under the securities act of the state in which the clients maintain principal places of residence; or

Any other client exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

A person without a place of business in this state if the person has had, during the preceding twelve (12) months, not more than five (5) clients that are resident in this state in addition to those specified under paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

Any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

It is unlawful for an investment adviser, directly or indirectly, to employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to investment advice in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or broker-dealer by an order under this act, the securities and exchange commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the investment adviser did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from the investment adviser and for good cause, the secretary of state, by order, may waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the investment adviser.

It is unlawful for an investment adviser to employ or associate with an individual required to be registered under this act as an investment adviser representative who transacts business in this state on behalf of the investment adviser unless the individual is registered under W.S. 17-4-404(a) or is exempt from registration under W.S. 17-4-404(b).

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-404.
Investment
adviser representative registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for an individual to transact business in this state as an investment adviser representative unless the individual is registered under this act as an investment adviser representative or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser representative under subsection (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

An individual who is employed by or associated with an investment adviser that is exempt from registration under W.S. 17-4-403(b) or a federal covered investment adviser that is excluded from the notice filing requirements of W.S.

17-4-405

; and

Any other individual exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

The registration of an investment adviser representative is not effective while the investment adviser representative is not employed by or associated with an investment adviser registered under this act or a federal covered investment adviser that has made or is required to make a notice filing under W.S.

17-4-405

.

An individual may transact business as an investment adviser representative for more than one (1) investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser unless a rule adopted or order issued under this act prohibits or limits an individual from acting as an investment adviser representative for more than one (1) investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser.

It is unlawful for an individual acting as an investment adviser representative, directly or indirectly, to conduct business in this state on behalf of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser if the registration of the individual as an investment adviser representative is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser by an order under this act, the securities and exchange commission, or a self-regulatory organization. Upon request from a federal covered investment adviser and for good cause, the secretary of state, by order issued, may waive, in whole or in part, the application of the requirements of this subsection to the federal covered investment adviser.

An investment adviser registered under this act, a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under W.S.

17-4-405

, or a broker-dealer registered under this act is not required to employ or associate with an individual as an investment adviser representative if the only compensation paid to the individual for a referral of investment advisory clients is paid to an investment adviser registered under this act, a federal covered investment adviser who has filed a notice under W.S.

17-4-405

, or a broker-dealer registered under this act with which the individual is employed or associated as an investment adviser representative.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-405.
Federal
covered investment adviser notice filing requirement.

Except with respect to a federal covered investment adviser described in subsection (b) of this section, it is unlawful for a federal covered investment adviser to transact business in this state as a federal covered investment adviser unless the federal covered investment adviser complies with subsection (c) of this section.

The following federal covered investment advisers are not required to comply with subsection (c) of this section:

A federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this state if its only clients in this state are:

Federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this act, and broker-dealers registered under this act;

Institutional investors;

Bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this state; or

Other clients specified by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

A federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this state if the person has had, during the preceding twelve (12) months, not more than five (5) clients that are resident in this state in addition to those specified under paragraph (i) of this subsection; and

Any other person excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

A person acting as a federal covered investment adviser, not excluded under subsection (b) of this section, shall file a notice, a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

, and such records as have been filed with the securities and exchange commission under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 required by rule adopted or order issued under this act and pay the fees specified in W.S. 17-4-410(e).

The notice under subsection (c) of this section becomes effective upon its filing.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-406.
Registration
by broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser
representative.

A person shall register as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative by filing an application and a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

, and paying the fee specified in W.S.

17-4-410

and any reasonable fees charged by the designee of the secretary of state for processing the filing. The application must contain:

The information or record required for the filing of a uniform application; and

Upon request by the secretary of state, any other financial or other information or record that the secretary of state determines is appropriate.

If the information or record contained in an application filed under subsection (a) of this section is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

If an order is not in effect and a proceeding is not pending under W.S.

17-4-412

, registration becomes effective at noon on the forty-fifth day after a completed application is filed, unless the registration is denied. A rule adopted or order issued under this act may set an earlier effective date or may defer the effective date until noon on the forty-fifth day after the filing of any amendment completing the application.

A registration is effective until midnight on December 31 of the year for which the application for registration is filed. Unless an order is in effect under W.S.

17-4-412

, a registration may be automatically renewed each year by filing such records as are required by rule adopted or order issued under this act, by paying the fee specified in W.S.

17-4-410

, and by paying costs charged by the designee of the secretary of state for processing the filings.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may impose such other conditions, not inconsistent with the National Securities Markets Improvement Act of 1996. An order issued under this act may waive, in whole or in part, specific requirements in connection with registration as are in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-407.
Succession
and change in registration of broker-dealer or investment adviser.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of another broker-dealer or investment adviser or a notice filing of a federal covered investment adviser, and a federal covered investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of an investment adviser or notice filing of another federal covered investment adviser, by filing as a successor an application for registration pursuant to W.S.

17-4-401

or

17-4-403

or a notice pursuant to W.S.

17-4-405

for the unexpired portion of the current registration or notice filing.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its form of organization or state of incorporation or organization may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration if the change does not involve a material change in its financial condition or management. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant in its filing. The new organization is a successor to the original registrant for the purposes of this act. If there is a material change in financial condition or management, the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall file a new application for registration. A predecessor registered under this act shall stop conducting its securities business other than winding down transactions and shall file for withdrawal of broker-dealer or investment adviser registration within forty-five (45) days after filing its amendment to effect succession.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its name may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant.

A change of control of a broker-dealer or investment adviser may be made in accordance with a rule adopted or order issued under this act.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-408.
Termination
of employment or association of agent and investment adviser representative
and transfer of employment or association.

If an agent registered under this act terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer or issuer, or if an investment adviser representative registered under this act terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser, or if either registrant terminates activities that require registration as an agent or investment adviser representative, the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser shall promptly file a notice of termination. If the registrant learns that the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser has not filed the notice, the registrant may do so.

If an agent registered under this act terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer registered under this act and begins employment by or association with another broker-dealer registered under this act; or if an investment adviser representative registered under this act terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser registered under this act or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under W.S.

17-4-405

and begins employment by or association with another investment adviser registered under this act or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under W.S.

17-4-405

; then upon the filing by or on behalf of the registrant, within thirty (30) days after the termination, of an application for registration that complies with the requirement of W.S. 17-4-406(a) and payment of the filing fee required under W.S.

17-4-410

, the registration of the agent or investment adviser representative is:

Immediately effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s central registration depository record or successor record or the investment adviser representative’s investment adviser registration depository record or successor record does not contain a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the previous twelve (12) months; or

Temporarily effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s central registration depository record or successor record or the investment adviser representative’s investment adviser registration depository record or successor record contains a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the preceding twelve (12) months.

The secretary of state may withdraw a temporary registration if there are or were grounds for discipline as specified in W.S.

17-4-412

and the secretary of state does so within thirty (30) days after the filing of the application. If the secretary of state does not withdraw the temporary registration within the thirty (30) day period, registration becomes automatically effective on the thirty-first day after filing.

The secretary of state may prevent the effectiveness of a transfer of an agent or investment adviser representative under paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this section based on the public interest and the protection of investors.

If the secretary of state determines that a registrant or applicant for registration is no longer in existence or has ceased to act as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or is the subject of an adjudication of incapacity or is subject to the control of a committee, conservator, or guardian, or cannot reasonably be located, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require the registration be cancelled or terminated or the application denied. The secretary of state may reinstate a cancelled or terminated registration, with or without hearing, and may make the registration retroactive.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-409.
Withdrawal
of registration of broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment
adviser representative.

Withdrawal of
registration by a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment
adviser representative becomes effective sixty (60) days after the
filing of the application to withdraw or within any shorter period
as provided by rule adopted or order issued under this act unless
a revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application
is filed. If a proceeding is pending, withdrawal becomes effective
when and upon such conditions as required by rule adopted or order
issued under this act. The secretary of state may institute a revocation
or suspension proceeding under W.S.

17-4-412

within one
(1) year after the withdrawal became effective automatically and issue
a revocation or suspension order as of the last date on which registration
was effective if a proceeding is not pending.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-410.
Filing fees.

A person shall pay a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) when initially filing an application for registration as a broker-dealer and a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) when filing a renewal of registration as a broker-dealer. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the secretary of state shall retain the entire fee.

The fee for an individual is forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing an application for registration as an agent, a fee of forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing a renewal of registration as an agent, and a fee of forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing for a change of registration as an agent. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the secretary of state shall retain the entire fee.

A person shall pay a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) when filing an application for registration as an investment adviser and a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the secretary of state shall retain the entire fee.

The fee for an individual is forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing an application for registration as an investment adviser representative, a fee of forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser representative, and a fee of forty-five dollars ($45.00) when filing a change of registration as an investment adviser representative. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the secretary of state shall retain the entire fee.

A federal covered investment adviser required to file a notice under W.S.

17-4-405

shall pay an initial fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) and an annual notice fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

A person required to pay a filing or notice fee under this section may transmit the fee through or to a designee as a rule or order provides under this act.

An investment adviser representative who is registered as an agent under W.S.

17-4-402

and who represents a person that is both registered as a broker-dealer under W.S.

17-4-401

and registered as an investment adviser under W.S.

17-4-403

or required as a federal covered investment adviser to make a notice filing under W.S.

17-4-405

is not required to pay an initial or annual registration fee for registration as an investment adviser representative.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)" for "two hundred dollars ($200.00)" twice in (a).

§ 17-4-411.
Post registration
requirements.

Subject to section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)) or section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this act may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this act and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this act.

Subject to section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)) or section 222(b) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-22), a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this act and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this act shall file such financial reports as are required by a rule adopted or order issued under this act. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

Subject to section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)) or section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-22):

A broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this act and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this act shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by rule adopted or order issued under this act;

Broker-dealer records required to be maintained under paragraph (i) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under section 17(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78q(a)) if they are readily accessible to the secretary of state; and

Investment adviser records required to be maintained under paragraph (i) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage required by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this act and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this act are subject to such reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the secretary of state, within or without this state, as the secretary of state considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The secretary of state may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the secretary of state reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The secretary of state may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection.

Subject to section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)) or section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount as set by rule. The secretary of state may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this act whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this act whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by rule or order under this act. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in W.S. 17-4-509(k)(ii).

Subject to section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)) or section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-22), an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A rule adopted or order issued under this act may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client.

With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this act, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require that information or other record be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this state as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may require an individual registered under W.S.

17-4-402

or

17-4-404

to participate in a continuing education program approved by the securities and exchange commission and administered by a self-regulatory organization or, in the absence of such a program, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require continuing education for an individual registered under W.S.

17-4-404

.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.